Utah statutes.
62A-11-313.   Effect of Lien.

(1)  After receiving notice that a support lien has been filed under this part by the office, no person in possession of any property which may be subject to that lien may pay over, release, sell, transfer, encumber, or convey that property to any person other than the office, unless he first receives:

(a)  a release or waiver thereof from the office; or

(b)  a court order that orders release of the lien on the basis that the debt does not exist or has been satisfied.

(2)  Whenever any such person has in his possession earnings, deposits, accounts, or balances in excess of $100 over the amount of the debt claimed by the office, that person may, without liability under this part, release that excess to the obligor.

